District of Columbia statutes.
7-227

Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to a particular person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications.

History

Oct. 8, 1981, D.C. Law 4-34, § 28, 28 DCR 3271

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-227.